Texas, session 892, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 36.1132, Water Code, is amended by adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (d)  A district may not issue a permit to an applicant for the production and transfer out of the district of groundwater if the issuance of the permit would authorize the applicant to produce and transfer out of the district a total amount of groundwater, considering all permits issued by the district to the applicant, in an amount that would exceed five percent of the total modeled available groundwater apportioned to the district as determined by the executive administrator. SECTION 2.  Section 36.1132(d), Water Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a permit issued by a groundwater conservation district on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.